Utah statutes.
77-16a-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Board of Pardons and Parole established under Section 77-27-2.

(2)  "Department" means the Department of Human Services.

(3)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of Human Services.

(4)  "Mental health facility" means the Utah State Hospital or other facility that provides mental health services under contract with the division, a local mental health authority, or organization that contracts with a local mental health authority.

(5)  "Mental illness" is as defined in Section 76-2-305.

(6)  "Offender with a mental illness" means an individual who has been adjudicated guilty with a mental illness, including an individual who has an intellectual disability.

(7)  "UDC" means the Department of Corrections.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

